Nebraska, session 109, LB732.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-7301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7301 Sections 71-7301 to 71-7307 and section 6 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Let Them Grow Act.
Sec. 2. Section 71-7303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7303 For purposes of the Let Them Grow Act:
(1) Biological sex means the biological indication of male and
female in the context of reproductive potential or capacity, such as sex
chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous
internal and external genitalia present at birth, without regard to an
individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of gender;
(2) Congenital defect means a physical or chemical abnormality
present in an individual younger than nineteen years of age that is
inconsistent with the normal development of a human being of such
individual's biological sex, including abnormalities caused by a
medically verifiable disorder of sex development. Congenital defect does
not include gender dysphoria, gender identity disorder, or any mental
condition;
(3) (2) Cross-sex hormones means testosterone or other androgens
given to biological females in amounts that are larger or more potent
than would normally occur naturally in healthy biological sex females and
estrogen given to biological males in amounts that are larger or more
potent than would normally occur naturally in healthy biological sex
males;
(4) (3) Gender means the psychological, behavioral, social, and
cultural aspects of being male or female;
(5) (4) Gender-altering surgery means any medical or surgical
service that seeks to surgically alter or remove healthy physical or
anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for the
individual's biological sex in order to instill or create physiological
-2-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
or anatomical characteristics that resemble a sex different from the
individual's biological sex, including without limitation, genital or
nongenital gender-altering surgery performed for the purpose of assisting
an individual with a gender alteration;
(6) (5) Gender alteration means the process in which a person goes
from identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to his or
her biological sex to identifying with and living as a gender different
from his or her biological sex and may involve social, legal, or physical
changes;
(7)(a) (6)(a) Gender-altering procedures includes any medical or
surgical service, including without limitation physician's services,
inpatient and outpatient hospital services, or prescribed drugs related
to gender alteration, that seeks to:
(i) Alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or
features that are typical for the individual's biological sex; or
(ii) Instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics
that resemble a sex different from the individual's biological sex,
including without limitation medical services that provide puberty-
blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or other mechanisms to promote the
development of feminizing or masculinizing features in the opposite
biological sex, or genital or nongenital gender-altering surgery
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration;
(b) Gender-altering procedures does not include:
(i) Services to persons born with a medically verifiable disorder of
sex development, including a person with external biological sex
characteristics that are irresolvably ambiguous, such as those born with
46 XX chromosomes with virilization, 46 XY chromosomes with
undervirilization, or having both ovarian and testicular tissue;
(ii) Services provided when a health care practitioner has otherwise
diagnosed a disorder of sexual development that the health care
-3-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
practitioner has determined, through genetic or biochemical testing, that
the person does not have normal sex-chromosome structure, sex-steroid
production, or sex-steroid hormone action;
(iii) The acute and chronic treatment of any infection, injury,
disease, or disorder that has been caused by or exacerbated by the
performance of a gender-altering procedure, whether or not the gender-
altering procedure was performed in accordance with state and federal
law; or
(iv) Any procedure undertaken because the individual suffers from a
physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness that would, as
certified by the health care practitioner, place the individual in
imminent danger of death or impairment of major bodily function unless
surgery is performed;
(8) (7) Genital gender-altering surgery means a medical procedure
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration, including without limitation:
(a) Surgical procedures such as penectomy, orchiectomy,
vaginoplasty, clitoroplasty, or vulvoplasty for biologically male
patients or hysterectomy or ovariectomy for biologically female patients;
(b) Reconstruction of the fixed part of the urethra with or without
a metoidioplasty; or
(c) Phalloplasty, vaginectomy, scrotoplasty, or implantation of
erection or testicular prostheses for biologically female patients;
(9) (8) Health care practitioner means a person licensed or
certified under the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(10) (9) Puberty-blocking drugs means gonadotropin-releasing hormone
analogues or other synthetic drugs used in biological males to stop
luteinizing hormone secretion and therefore testosterone secretion, or
synthetic drugs used in biological females which stop the production of
estrogens and progesterone, when used to delay or suppress pubertal
development in children for the purpose of assisting an individual with a
-4-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
gender alteration; and
(11) (10) Nongenital gender-altering surgery means medical
procedures performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a
gender alteration, including without limitation:
(a) Surgical procedures for biologically male patients, such as
voice surgery or thyroid cartilage reduction; or
(b) Surgical procedures for biologically female patients, such as
subcutaneous mastectomy or voice surgery; and .
(12) Telehealth has the same meaning as in section 38-120.01.
Sec. 3. Section 71-7304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7304 (1) Except as provided in the Let Them Grow Act and the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, a
health care practitioner shall not perform gender-altering procedures in
this state, including via telehealth to an individual located in this
state, for an individual younger than nineteen years of age.
(2) The intentional and knowing performance of gender-altering
procedures by a health care practitioner for an individual younger than
nineteen years of age in violation of subsection (1) of this section
shall be considered unprofessional conduct as defined in section 38-179.
(3) This section does not apply to the continuation of treatment
using puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or both when the course
of treatment began before October 1, 2023, and concluded on or before
January 1, 2027.
(4) This section does not apply to nonsurgical gender-altering
procedures when such procedures are provided:
(a) Prior to the effective date of this act in compliance with the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to subsection (1)
of section 71-7305; or .
(b) On and after the effective date of this act in compliance with
subsection (2) of section 71-7305.
-5-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
Sec. 4. Section 71-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7305 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the The chief medical officer as designated in section 81-3115 shall
adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to
provide for nonsurgical gender-altering procedures for individuals
younger than nineteen years of age, such as puberty-blocking drugs,
cross-sex hormones, or both. Such rules and regulations shall be
consistent with the Let Them Grow Act and, at a minimum, include the
following:
(a) Specify that a health care practitioner may prescribe approved
puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or both to an individual
younger than nineteen years of age if such individual has a long-lasting
and intense pattern of gender nonconformity or gender dysphoria which
began or worsened at the start of puberty;
(b) Specific criteria, obligations, or conditions regulating the
administration, prescribing, delivery, sale, or use of puberty-blocking
drugs, cross-sex hormones, or both involving an individual younger than
nineteen years of age in accordance with subdivision (1)(a) of this
section, which shall, at a minimum, set forth the following:
(i) The minimum number of gender-identity-focused therapeutic hours
required prior to an individual receiving puberty-blocking drugs, cross-
sex hormones, or both;
(ii) Patient advisory requirements necessary for a health care
practitioner to obtain informed patient consent;
(iii) Patient medical record documentation requirements to ensure
compliance with the act; and
(iv) A minimum waiting period between the time the health care
practitioner obtains informed patient consent and the administration,
prescribing, or delivery of puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones,
or both to such patient; and
-6-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
(c) Specify that section 71-7304 does not apply to nonsurgical
gender-altering procedures when such procedures are provided in
compliance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on and after the effective date of this act, a
health care practitioner shall not knowingly prescribe for or provide to
an individual in this state younger than nineteen years of age cross-sex
hormones or puberty-blocking drugs for the purpose of assisting the
individual with a gender alteration.
(b) A health care practitioner does not violate this subsection if:
(i) The cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs were prescribed
for or provided to an individual in this state younger than nineteen
years of age to treat the individual's congenital defect, precocious
puberty, disease, or physical injury; or
(ii) The cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs were
prescribed for or provided to an individual in this state younger than
nineteen years of age in compliance with the Let Them Grow Act and the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section and such treatment concluded on or before January 1,
2027.
(c) For purposes of subdivision (2)(b) of this section, disease does
not include any gender nonconformity, gender dysphoria, gender identity
disorder, or mental condition.
(d) The chief medical officer as designated in section 81-3115 shall
adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary to carry out
this subsection.
(3) (2) The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with the rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the chief medical officer that are
necessary to carry out the Let Them Grow Act.
Sec. 5. Section 71-7307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-7-

LB732 LB732
2026 2026
2024, is amended to read:
71-7307 (1) An individual that received a gender-altering procedure
in violation of section 71-7304 after October 1, 2023, and while such
individual was younger than nineteen years of age, or the parent or
guardian of such an individual, may bring a civil action for appropriate
relief against the health care practitioner who performed the gender-
altering procedure. Appropriate relief in an action under this section
includes actual damages and reasonable attorney's fees. An action under
this section shall be brought within two years after discovery of
damages.
(2) If a court in any civil action brought pursuant to this section
finds that a health care practitioner knowingly violated section 71-7304,
the court shall notify the Attorney General and the Department of Health
and Human Services by mailing a certified copy of the court's order to
the Attorney General and the department. Notification pursuant to this
subsection shall be made upon the judgment of the court being made final.
Sec. 6. (1) The Attorney General may bring an action against a
health care practitioner that knowingly violates the Let Them Grow Act,
within twenty years of the violation, to (a) enjoin further violations
and (b) recover a civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars per
violation.
(2) Each time a health care practitioner performs a gender-altering
procedure, including each instance of prescribing or providing cross-sex
hormones and puberty-blocking drugs in violation of the Let Them Grow
Act, constitutes a separate violation.
(3) Any civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 7. Original sections 71-7301, 71-7303, 71-7304, 71-7305, and
71-7307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-